Tennessee, session 114, HB1066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 4, Part 5, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, if a state entity submits three (3)
complaints within a six-month period to the department regarding a vending facility
manager at a specific location, then the department must assign a new vending facility
manager to that location.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1066
001028
- 1 -